Texas, session 892, SB5.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  TRUSTEED PROGRAMS WITHIN THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR: FEMA MATCH AND DISASTER FUNDS. The amount of $200,000,000 is appropriated from the economic stabilization fund to the Trusteed Programs within the Office of the Governor for the two-year period beginning on the effective date of this Act to be used: (1)  to match federal money received related to disaster response, relief, and recovery; and (2)  for the disaster needs of this state in a manner consistent with Strategy A.1.1, Disaster Funds, as listed in Chapter 1170 (H.B. 1), Acts of the 88th Legislature, Regular Session, 2023 (the General Appropriations Act), and Chapter 1185 (S.B. 1), Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025 (the General Appropriations Act). SECTION 2.  TRUSTEED PROGRAMS WITHIN THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR: LOCAL GRANTS. The amount of $50,000,000 is appropriated from the economic stabilization fund to the Trusteed Programs within the Office of the Governor for the two-year period beginning on the effective date of this Act to be used for the purpose of making grants to assist counties, municipalities, or other local governments operating within Bandera, Bexar, Burnet, Caldwell, Coke, Comal, Concho, Edwards, Gillespie, Guadalupe, Hamilton, Kendall, Kerr, Kimble, Kinney, Lampasas, Llano, Mason, Maverick, McCulloch, Menard, Real, Reeves, San Saba, Schleicher, Sutton, Tom Green, Travis, Uvalde, or Williamson County, as provided by the governor's declaration of disaster on July 4, 2025, regarding a heavy rainfall and flooding event and the subsequent amendments to that declaration, in establishing and implementing a system of flood warning sirens and flood gauges and purchasing other related equipment. SECTION 3.  TRUSTEED PROGRAMS WITHIN THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR: METEOROLOGICAL FORECASTING. The amount of $28,000,000 is appropriated from the economic stabilization fund to the Trusteed Programs within the Office of the Governor for the two-year period beginning on the effective date of this Act to be used for the purpose of providing disaster preparedness grants for enhanced atmospheric measurement and modeling techniques to improve meteorological forecasting, enhance weather intelligence and forecasting accuracy, and improve flood management and timeliness of flood warnings. SECTION 4.  DEPARTMENT OF STATE HEALTH SERVICES: CAMPGROUND AND YOUTH CAMP SAFETY CONTINGENT APPROPRIATIONS. (a) Contingent on the enactment of S.B. 1 or similar legislation of the 89th Legislature, 2nd Called Session, 2025, relating to campground and youth camp safety, the amount of $2,594,265 is appropriated from the economic stabilization fund for use during the two-year period beginning on the effective date of this Act, and the amount of $2,484,726 is appropriated from the general revenue fund for use during the state fiscal year beginning September 1, 2026, to the Department of State Health Services to implement the provisions of that legislation. The department shall adjust the amount of license fees established under Section 141.0035, Health and Safety Code, as necessary to recover the costs of the appropriations made under this subsection. (b)  During the state fiscal biennium beginning September 1, 2025, in addition to the capital budget authority other law grants to the department during that period, the Department of State Health Services may use $500,000 in capital budget authority for the appropriations made by Subsection (a) of this section, if any. (c)  During the state fiscal biennium beginning September 1, 2025, in addition to the number of full-time equivalent (FTE) employees other law authorizes the department to employ during that period, the Department of State Health Services may employ 16.0 FTE employees out of money appropriated by Subsection (a) of this section, if any. SECTION 5.  LIMITATION, REPORTING, AND TRANSFER PROVISIONS OF GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS ACTS APPLY. Unless explicitly stated otherwise, the provisions relating to limitations, reporting, or transfer of Chapter 1170 (H.B. 1), Acts of the 88th Legislature, Regular Session, 2023 (the General Appropriations Act), and Chapter 1185 (S.B. 1), Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025 (the General Appropriations Act), apply to the appropriations made by this Act. SECTION 6.  EFFECTIVE DATE. (a) Subject to Subsection (b) of this section, this Act takes effect immediately. (b)  This Act takes effect only if it receives a vote of two-thirds of the members present in each house of the legislature, as provided by Section 49-g(m), Article III, Texas Constitution. ______________________________ ______________________________ President of the Senate Speaker of the House I hereby certify that S.B. No. 5 passed the Senate on August 18, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 30, Nays 0; August 22, 2025, Senate refused to concur in House amendment and requested appointment of Conference Committee; August 25, 2025, House granted request of the Senate; September 3, 2025, Senate adopted Conference Committee Report by the following vote:  Yeas 26, Nays 0; passed subject to the provisions of Article III, Section 49a, of the Constitution of Texas. ______________________________ Secretary of the Senate I hereby certify that S.B. No. 5 passed the House, with amendment, on August  21, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 137, Nays 0, one present not voting; August 25, 2025, House granted request of the Senate for appointment of Conference Committee; September 3, 2025, House adopted Conference Committee Report by the following vote:  Yeas 129, Nays 0, two present not voting; passed subject to the provisions of Article III, Section 49a, of the Constitution of Texas. ______________________________ Chief Clerk of the House Approved: ______________________________ Date I, _____________________________, Comptroller of Public Accounts, do ______________________________    hereby certify that the amounts Governor                appropriated in the herein S.B. No. 5, 2nd Called Session, 89th Legislature, are within the amount estimated to be available in the affected fund. Certified _____________, _____. ______________________________ Comptroller of Public Accounts